Wisconsin, session 2025, AB321.
do enact as follows:AB321,11Section 1. 939.6195 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB321,2,22939.6195 (1) (a) 1. A violation of s. 941.29 or, 941.2905, or 941.293.AB321,23Section 2. 941.291 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB321,2,154941.291 (1) (b) “Violent felony” means any felony, or the solicitation, 5conspiracy, or attempt to commit any felony, under s. 943.23 (1m) or (1r), 1999 6stats., or s. 943.23 (1g), 2021 stats., or s. 940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.06, 7940.08, 940.09, 940.10, 940.19, 940.195, 940.198, 940.20, 940.201, 940.203, 8940.204, 940.21, 940.225, 940.23, 940.285 (2), 940.29, 940.295 (3), 940.30, 940.305, 9940.31, 940.43 (1) to (3), 940.45 (1) to (3), 941.20, 941.26, 941.28, 941.29, 941.293, 10941.30, 941.327, 943.01 (2) (c), 943.011, 943.013, 943.02, 943.04, 943.06, 943.10 (2), 11943.231 (1), 943.32, 943.81, 943.82, 943.83, 943.85, 943.86, 943.87, 943.88, 943.89, 12943.90, 946.43, 947.015, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03, 948.04, 948.05, 948.06, 13948.07, 948.08, 948.085, or 948.30; or, if the victim is a financial institution, as 14defined in s. 943.80 (2), a felony, or the solicitation, conspiracy, or attempt to commit 15a felony under s. 943.84 (1) or (2).AB321,316Section 3. 941.293 of the statutes is created to read:AB321,2,1817941.293 Undetectable firearms; serial numbers on firearm 18components. (1) In this section:AB321,2,2019(a) “Major component” means the barrel, the slide or cylinder, or the frame or 20receiver of a firearm.AB321,3,11(b) “Undetectable firearm” means any of the following:AB321,3,421. A firearm that, after the removal of grips, stocks, and magazines, is not 3detectable by a metal detector calibrated to detect a security exemplar, as defined in 418 USC 922 (p) (2) (C).AB321,3,852. A firearm if any major component of it does not generate an image that 6accurately depicts the shape of the component when subject to inspection by 7security scanners, x-ray machines, or other security devices commonly used at 8airports.AB321,3,109(2) (a) 1. Whoever sells, offers to sell, transfers, transports, manufactures, 10possesses, or goes armed with an undetectable firearm is guilty of a Class G felony.AB321,3,13112. Whoever sells, offers to sell, transfers, posts, provides to another, or 12possesses plans for manufacturing an undetectable firearm is guilty of a Class H 13felony.AB321,3,1714(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a person who is licensed by a state or the 15federal government to manufacture undetectable firearms while the person is on 16official duty. Paragraph (a) 1. does not apply to a law enforcement officer while on 17official duty or to armed forces or national guard personnel while on official duty.AB321,3,2018(3) (a) Whoever possesses a frame or a receiver of a firearm that is not 19attached to a firearm and that is not marked or engraved with a serial number is 20guilty of a Class I felony.AB321,4,221(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a firearm frame or receiver manufactured 22before 1968, a person who is licensed by a state or the federal government to 23manufacture undetectable firearms while the person is on official duty, a law 1enforcement officer while on official duty, or armed forces or national guard 2personnel while on official duty.AB321,4,33